New Jersey, session 222, A1847.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section: Gender-affirming health care services means all supplies, care, and services of a medical, surgical, therapeutic, diagnostic, preventative, rehabilitative, or supportive nature, including medication, relating to the treatment of gender dysphoria and gender incongruence.  Gender-affirming health care shall not include supplies, care, and services of a behavioral health, mental health, or psychiatric nature. Health care professional means a person licensed or otherwise authorized pursuant to Title 45 or Title 52 of the Revised Statutes to practice a health care profession that is regulated by the Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs or by one of the following boards:  the State Board of Medical Examiners, the New Jersey Board of Nursing, the New Jersey State Board of Dentistry, the New Jersey State Board of Optometrists, the New Jersey State Board of Pharmacy, the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, the Acupuncture Examining Board, the State Board of Physical Therapy, the State Board of Respiratory Care, the Orthotics and Prosthetics Board of Examiners, the State Board of Psychological Examiners, the State Board of Social Work Examiners, the State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners, the State Board of Examiners of Ophthalmic Dispensers and Ophthalmic Technicians, the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Advisory Committee, the State Board of Marriage and Family Therapy Examiners, the Occupational Therapy Advisory Council, and the Certified Psychoanalysts Advisory Committee. b.  Notwithstanding the provision of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no health care professional shall provide gender-affirming health care services to any individual under 21 years of age. c. A health care professional who violates subsection b. of this section shall be subject to discipline for professional misconduct pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1978, c.73 (C.45:1-21). 2. The Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety and the Commissioner of Health shall each adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.